District of Columbia statutes.
7-851

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Health benefit plan” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3301.01(20).

(2)

“Health insurer” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 31-3301.01(22).

(3)

“Hearing impairment” means a dysfunction of the auditory system, of any type or degree, which is sufficient to interfere with the acquisition and development of speech and language skills, with or without the use of sound amplification.

History

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-276, § 2, 48 DCR 1865